lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės katėms > Baldai katėms: Medžiai ir namai katėms; Laktos ir paaukštintos platformos katėms; Draskyklės ir draskymo stovai katėms; Laiptai ir rampos katėms; Medžiai ir bokštai katėms; Gulyklos prie lango ir paaukštintos platformos katėms; Lauko nameliai katėms
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для кошек > Лежанки, домики и когтеточки для кошек: Домики для кошек; Полки и лежанки для кошек; Когтеточки для кошек (столбики и другие); Лестницы и пандусы для кошек; Игровые комплексы для кошек; Лежаки для кошек на окно; Уличные домики для кошек
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za mačke > Pohištvo za mačke: Mačja bivališča in hiške; Grede in police za mačke; Mačji praskalniki in praskalni stebri; Stopnice in rampe za mačke; Mačja drevesa in stolpi; Okenske postelje in gredi za mačke; Zunanje mačje hiške
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Macskakellékek > Macskabútorok: Macskaházak és -búvóhelyek; Macskaülőkék és -polcok; Macskakaparók és kaparóoszlopok; Macskalépcsők és -rámpák; Macskafák és -tornyok; Macska-ablakágyak és -ülőkék; Kültéri macskaházak
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Kattillbehör > Kattmöbler: Katthem och hus; Kattpinnar och hyllor; Kattklösare och klöspålar; Kattrappor och ramper; Katträd och torn; Kattfönstersängar och sittpinnar; Utomhuskatthus
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Артикули за котки > Котешки мебели: Котешки апартаменти и къщи; Котешки катерушки и рафтове; Драскалки и пилони за котки; Котешки стъпала и рампи; Котешки дървета и кули; Котешки легла за прозорци; Външни котешки къщи
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Cat Supplies > Cat Furniture: Cat Condos & Houses; Cat Perches & Shelves; Cat Scratchers & Scratching Posts; Cat Steps & Ramps; Cat Trees & Towers; Cat Window Beds & Perches; Outdoor Cat Houses
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 猫用品 > 猫用家具: 猫用コンドミニアム・ハウス; 猫用ウィンドウパーチ・シェルフ; 猫爪とぎ＆爪とぎポスト; 猫用階段・スロープ; キャットツリー・タワー; 猫用ウィンドベッド・パーチ; 屋外用猫小屋
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για γάτες > Έπιπλα για γάτες: Διαμερίσματα & σπίτια για γάτες; Κλαδιά & ράφια για γάτες; Συσκευές ξυσίματος & στήλες ξυσίματος για γάτες; Σκαλοπάτια & ράμπες για γάτες; Δέντρα & πύργοι για γάτες; Κρεβάτια & βάσεις παραθύρων για γάτες; Υπαίθρια σπιτάκια για γάτες
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Productos para gatos > Mobiliario para gatos: Torres y casas para gatos; Posaderos y estantes para gatos; Rascadores y postes rascadores para gatos; Escalones y rampas para gatos; Árboles y torres para gatos; Camas y posaderos para ventanas para gatos; Casas para gatos al aire libre
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 猫用品 > 猫用家具: 猫公寓和房屋; 猫栖架和架子; 猫抓板和猫抓柱; 猫台阶和坡道; 猫爬架; 带窗猫床和栖架; 户外猫屋
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre mačky > Nábytok pre mačky: Byty a domčeky pre mačky; Bidlá a nástenné police pre mačky; Škrabadlá a škrabacie stĺpy pre mačky; Mačacie schodíky a rampy; Mačacie stromy a veže; Postele a bidlá pre mačky; Vonkajšie domčeky pre mačky
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor katten > Kattenmeubels: Kattenappartementen en -huizen; Kattenstokken en -planken; Kattenkrabbers en -krabpalen; Kattentrappen; Kattenbomen en -torens; Kattenraambedden en -stokken; Kattenhuizen voor buiten
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Articoli per gatti > Arredi per gatti: Condomini e case per gatti; Trespoli e scaffali per gatti; Tiragraffi per gatti; Gradini e rampe per gatti; Tiragraffi e torri per gatti; Letti e trespoli per gatti; Case per gatti all'aperto
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 반려묘용품 > 반려묘 가구: 반려묘 콘도/집; 반려묘 선반; 반려묘 스크래처/스크래처 기둥; 반려묘 계단/경사대; 캣트리/캣타워; 반려묘 창문 침대/선반; 반려묘 실외 하우스
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos para gatos > Mobiliário para gatos: Condomínios e casas para gatos; Poleiros e apoios para gatos; Arranhadores e postes para arranhar para gatos; Degraus e rampas para gatos; Árvores e torres para gatos; Camas e poleiros para janelas para gatos; Casas para gatos de exterior
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla kotów > Meble dla kotów: Budki i domki dla kotów; Legowiska i półki dla kotów; Drapaki i słupki do drapania dla kotów; Stopnie i rampy dla kotów; Drzewa i wieże dla kotów; Legowiska na okno dla kota; Zewnętrzne domki dla kota
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Katteprodukter > Kattemøbler: Katteleiligheter og -hus; Kattehengere og -hyller; Katteskrapere og skrapestolper; Kattetrinn og -ramper; Kattetrær og -tårn; Vindussenger og -hengere for katt; Utendørs kattehus
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Katzenbedarf > Katzenmöbel: Kratzmöbel und Häuser für Katzen; Katzenregale und -sitze; Kratzbäume Katzen; Treppen & Rampen für Katzen; Katzenbäume und Türme; Fensterbetten und -sitze für Katzen; Katzenhäuser im Freien
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Kedi Ürünleri > Kedi Mobilyaları: Kedi Apartmanları ve Evleri; Kedi Tünekleri ve Rafları; Kedi Tırmalama Tahtaları ve Tırmalama Direkleri; Kedi Basamakları ve Rampaları; Kedi Ağaçları ve Kuleleri; Kedi Pencere Yatakları ve Tünekleri; Dış Mekan Kedi Evleri
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Accessoires pour chats > Meubles pour chats: Appartements et maisons pour chats; Perchoirs et étagères pour chats; Griffoirs pour chats; Marches et rampes pour chats; Arbres à chat et tours; Lits et perchoirs pour chats; Niches extérieures pour chats
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สำหรับแมว > เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับแมว: คอนโดและบ้านแมว; ที่เกาะและชั้นแมว; ที่ฝนเล็บแมวและเสาลับเล็บ; บันไดและทางลาดแมว; ต้นไม้และหอคอยแมว; เตียงและคอนตรงหน้าต่างสำหรับแมว; บ้านแมวกลางแจ้ง
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Kissojen tarvikkeet > Kissojen huonekalut: Kissojen asunnot ja talot; Kissojen tasot ja hyllyt; Raapimalevyt ja -pinnat; Kissojen portaat ja rampit; Raapimapuut ja -tornit; Kissojen ikkunapedit ja tasot; Kissojen ulkotalot
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Sản phẩm dùng cho mèo > Đồ dùng cho mèo: Nhà cho mèo; Giá & kệ cho mèo; Bàn cào móng & trụ cào móng mèo; Bậc thang & thềm dốc cho mèo; Nhà cây & tháp cho mèo; Giường & võng treo cửa sổ cho mèo; Nhà cho mèo ngoài trời
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 貓用品 > 貓家具: 貓公寓和房屋; 貓跳台; 貓抓板; 貓樓梯和斜坡; 樹狀貓跳台; 貓窗台吊床和跳台; 戶外貓屋
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za mačke > Namještaj za mačke: Penjalice s ležajevima i kućice za mačke; Viseće ležaljke i police za mačke; Grebalice i stupovi za grebanje za mačke; Stepenice i rampe za mačke; Penjalice i tornjevi za mačke; Viseće ležaljke i kreveti za prozor; Vanjske kućice za mačke
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para gatos > Móveis para gatos: Condomínios e casas para gatos; Poleiros e prateleiras para gatos; Arranhadores e postes de arranhar para gatos; Escadas e rampas para gatos; Árvores e torres para gatos; Camas e poleiros para janelas para gatos; Casas para gatos ao ar livre
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro kočky > Nábytek pro kočky: Domečky pro kočky; Odpočívadla a police pro kočky; Škrabadla a sloupce pro kočky; Schůdky a rampy pro kočky; Stromy a věže pro kočky; Okenní pelíšky a odpočívadla pro kočky; Venkovní domečky pro kočky
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru pisici > Mobilier pentru pisici: Apartamente și căsuțe pentru pisici; Stinghii și rafturi pentru pisici; Covorașe și stâlpi pentru ascuțit ghearele; Scări și rampe pentru pisici; Copaci și turnuri pentru pisici; Paturi și stinghii pentru ferestre pentru pisici; Căsuțe pentru pisici în aer liber
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til katte > Møbler til katte: Lejligheder og huse til katte; Pinde og hylder til katte; Kradsetræer og kradsestolper til katte; Trapper og ramper til katte; Træer og tårne til katte; Vinduesenge og siddepinde til katte; Udendørs kattehuse